Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-901.04
Conditions of release; amendment; review.

Any judge who shall order the release of a defendant on any condition specified in section 29-901 may at any time amend his order to impose additional or different conditions of release, but if the imposition of different or additional conditions results in the detention of the defendant as a result of his inability to meet such conditions, the provisions of section 29-901.03 shall apply.

Laws 1974, LB 828, § 5.